Massachusetts, session 194th, H317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 147 of the general laws is hereby amended in section 1 by striking the section in 
its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following new section: 
Section 1. (a) The commissioner of occupational licensure shall supervise the work 
of the several boards of registration and examination included in the division of occupational 
licensure.  The commissioner shall recommend changes in the methods of conducting 
examinations and transacting business and shall make such reports to the governor and council as 
they may require or as the commission may deem expedient.  
(b) The commissioner may consider requests to eliminate, reduce, or 
otherwise diminish standards or requirements for professional licensure of individuals, 

of 2 10 businesses, or trades; provided however that the commissioner shall not have the authority to 
grant said requests without approval by a majority vote of the board of registration that oversees 
the trade or profession said request affects.